hu: Támogatott DVI-kapcsolat típusa: Mindkét; Kétkapcsolatú; Egykapcsolatú; Egyéb
ru: Поддерживаемый тип канала DVI: Обе; Двойной канал; Одинарный канал; Другой
tr: Desteklenen DVI bağlantı tipi: İkisi birden; Çift bağlantılı; Tek bağlantılı; Diğer
bg-BG: Поддържан тип DVI връзка: И двете; Двойна връзка; Единична връзка; Други
fr: Type de liaison DVI pris en charge: Les deux; Double liaison; Simple liaison; Autre
sk-SK: Podporovaný typ DVI prepojenia: Oba; Dvojitý spoj; Jednoduchý spoj; Iné
ja: サポートされるDVIリンクタイプ: 両方; デュアルリンク; シングルリンク; その他
fi: Tuettu DVI-linkkityyppi: Molemmat; Kaksoisyhteys; Yksittäisyhteys; Muu
sv: DVI-länktyp som stöds: Båda; Dual-link; Single-link; Övrigt
pt-BR: Tipo de link DVI suportado: Ambos; Link duplo; Link único; Outro
hr-HR: Podržani tip DVI veze: Oboje; Dvostruka veza; Jednostruka veza; Ostalo
de: Unterstützter DVI-Link-Typ: Beide; Dual-Link; Single-Link; Sonstiges
it: Tipo di collegamento DVI supportato: Entrambi; Dual-link; Single-link; Altro
nb: Støttet DVI-koblingstype: Begge; Dual-link; Single-link; Annet
pl: Obsługiwany typ łącza DVI: Obydwa; Dual-link; Single-link; Inne
cs: Podporovaný typ spojení DVI: Obě možnosti; Dual-link; Single-link; Jiné
zh-TW: 支援的 DVI 連結類型: 兩者; 雙連結; 單連結; 其他
da: Understøttet DVI-linktype: Begge; Dual-link; Single-link; Andet
el: Υποστηριζόμενος τύπος σύνδεσης DVI: Και οι δύο; Dual-link; Single-link; Άλλο
nl: Ondersteund DVI-linktype: Beide; Dual-link; Single-link; Andere
vi: Loại liên kết DVI được hỗ trợ: Cả hai; Liên kết kép; Liên kết đơn; Khác
ro-RO: Tip de legătură DVI acceptat: Ambele; Dual-link; Single-link; Altele
ko: 지원되는 DVI 링크 유형: 둘 다; 듀얼 링크; 싱글 링크; 기타
lt-LT: Palaikomas DVI ryšio tipas: Abu; Dviguba jungtis; Vienguba jungtis; Kita
zh-CN: 支持的 DVI 链路类型: 两者; 双通道; 单通道; 其他
th: ประเภทลิงก์ DVI ที่รองรับ: ทั้งคู่; ดูอัลลิงค์; ซิงเกิลลิงค์; อื่นๆ
sl-SI: Podprt tip povezave DVI: Oboje; Dvojna povezava; Enojna povezava; Drugo
es: Tipo de enlace DVI soportado: Ambos; Enlace dual; Enlace único; Otros
pt-PT: Tipo de link DVI suportado: Ambos; Ligação dupla; Ligação única; Outro
en: Supported DVI link type: Both; Dual-link; Single-link; Other